Washington statutes.
RCW 9.68.015

Obscene literature, shows, etc.—Exemptions.

Nothing in chapter 260, Laws of 1959 shall apply to the circulation of any such material by any recognized historical society or museum, the state law library, any county law library, the state library, the public library, any library of any college or university, or to any archive or library under the supervision and control of the state, county, municipality, or other political subdivision.

[ 1959 c 260 s 2.]